Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 2

Transitional Civil Service Provisions

65-1-201 — 65-1-204. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 65-1-301 — 65-1-304, concerning transitional civil service provisions, were deemed obsolete by the Code Commission in 2004, except for former § 65-1-303(b), which was transferred to present § 65-1-115. Sections 65-1-302, 65-1-303(a), and 65-1-304 were deemed obsolete except for defining the status and benefits.